Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [84.0287] SEARCHES AND SEIZURES BY CONSERVATION OFFICERS. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a conservation officer may not conduct a search or seizure except: new text end new text begin (1) pursuant to a warrant or other order issued by a court having appropriate jurisdiction; new text end new text begin (2) where necessary to prevent imminent danger to human life; or new text end new text begin (3) where a person consents to the search or seizure. new text end new text begin (b) When property is seized under this section, the seizing officer must provide a receipt to the person from whom the property is seized. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any law that confers authority on conservation officers by providing authority to peace officers must be construed consistently with this section. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.7741, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Seizure. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end An off-highway vehicle subject to forfeiture under this section may be seized by the appropriate agency deleted text begin upon process issued by any court having jurisdiction over the vehicledeleted text end new text begin in accordance with section 84.0287new text end . deleted text begin (b) Property may be seized without process if: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the seizure is incident to a lawful arrest or a lawful search; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) the vehicle subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior judgment in favor of the state in a criminal injunction or forfeiture proceeding under this section; or deleted text end deleted text begin (3) the appropriate agency has probable cause to believe that the delay occasioned by the necessity to obtain process would result in the removal or destruction of the vehicle. If property is seized without process under this clause, the prosecuting authority must institute a forfeiture action under this section as soon as is reasonably possible by serving a notice of seizure and intent to forfeit at the address of the owner as listed in the records of the Department of Public Safety or Department of Natural Resources. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) When an off-highway vehicle is seized, the officer must provide a receipt to the person found in possession of the vehicle; or in the absence of any person, the officer must leave a receipt in the place where the vehicle was found, if reasonably possible. deleted text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.89, is amended to read: 84.89 CONFISCATING SNOWMOBILE USED IN BURGLARY. new text begin When authorized under section 84.0287, new text end a law enforcement officer shall seize any snowmobile, as defined in section 84.81, used for the purpose of gaining access to property for the purpose of committing the crime of burglary, as defined in section 609.582. Any snowmobile seized pursuant to this section shall be held, subject to the order of the district court of the county in which the burglary was committed, and shall be confiscated after conviction of the person from whom the snowmobile was seized and disposed of in accordance with the procedure provided for equipment used in committing game and fish violations by section 97A.225, except that the balance of the proceeds from the sale of a confiscated snowmobile which are paid into the state treasury shall be credited to the general fund. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.221, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Property subject to seizure and confiscation. (a) new text begin When authorized under section 84.0287, new text end an enforcement officer may seize: (1) wild animals, wild rice, and other aquatic vegetation taken, bought, sold, transported, or possessed in violation of the game and fish laws or chapter 84 or 84D; and (2) firearms, bows and arrows, nets, boats, lines, poles, fishing rods and tackle, lights, lanterns, snares, traps, spears, dark houses, fish houses, and wild rice harvesting equipment that are used with the owner's knowledge to unlawfully take or transport wild animals, wild rice, or other aquatic vegetation and that have a value under $1,000 are subject to this section. (b) An item described in paragraph (a), clause (2), that has a value of $1,000 or more is subject to the provisions of section 97A.225. (c) new text begin When authorized under section 84.0287, new text end an enforcement officer must seize nets and equipment unlawfully possessed within ten miles of Lake of the Woods or Rainy Lake. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.223, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Property subject to seizure and forfeiture. (a) new text begin When authorized under section 84.0287, new text end an enforcement officer must seize: (1) firearms possessed in violation of state or federal law or court order; and (2) property described in section 97A.221, subdivision 1, where no owner can be determined. (b) Property seized under this section is subject to administrative forfeiture. Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.225, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Seizure. (a) new text begin When authorized under section 84.0287, new text end an enforcement officer must seize all motor vehicles used to: (1) shine wild animals in violation of section 97B.081, subdivision 1; (2) transport big game animals illegally taken or fur-bearing animals illegally purchased; or (3) transport minnows in violation of section 97C.501, 97C.515, or 97C.525. (b) An enforcement officer must seize all boats and motors used in netting fish on Lake of the Woods, Rainy Lake, Lake Superior, Namakan Lake, and Sand Point Lake in violation of licensing or operating requirements of section 97A.475, subdivision 30, 97C.825, 97C.831, or 97C.835, or a rule of the commissioner relating to these provisions. (c) An enforcement officer may seize all boats and motors with their trailers that are used to take, possess, or transport wild animals when the restitution value of the wild animals exceeds $500. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97B.021, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Seizing unlawfully possessed firearms. new text begin When authorized under section 84.0287, new text end a law enforcement officer shall seize a firearm used in violation of this section. The officer must tag the seized firearm with the name and address of the person from whom it was taken and give the person a receipt. The firearm shall be placed in the custody of the conservation officer in charge of the area where the seizure was made. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.355, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Shelters prohibited; dates and times. (a) A shelter, including a fish house or dark house, may not be on the ice unattended between midnight and one hour before sunrise after: (1) the first Monday in March, for state waters south of a line starting at the Minnesota-North Dakota border and formed by rights-of-way of U.S. Route No. 10, then east along U.S. Route No. 10 to Trunk Highway No. 34, then east along Trunk Highway No. 34 to Trunk Highway No. 200, then east along Trunk Highway No. 200 to U.S. Route No. 2, then east along U.S. Route No. 2 to the Minnesota-Wisconsin border; and (2) the third Monday in March, for other state waters. A shelter, including a fish house or dark house, on the ice in violation of this subdivision is subject to the enforcement provisions of paragraph (b). The commissioner may, by rule, change the dates in this paragraph for any part of state waters. Copies of the rule must be conspicuously posted on the shores of the waters as prescribed by the commissioner. (b) new text begin When authorized under section 84.0287, new text end a conservation officer must confiscate a fish house, dark house, or shelter in violation of paragraph (a). The officer may remove, burn, or destroy the house or shelter. The officer shall seize the contents of the house or shelter and hold them for 60 days. If the seized articles have not been claimed by the owner, they may be retained for the use of the division or sold at the highest price obtainable in a manner prescribed by the commissioner.